Florida, session 2026, SB1498.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 76 77 Section 1.âSubsection (33) of section 718.103, Florida 78 Statutes, is amended to read: 79 718.103âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 80 (33)ââVideo conferenceâ means a real-time audio- and video 81 based meeting between two or more people in different locations 82 using video-enabled and audio-enabled devices. The notice for 83 any meeting that is open to the unit owners and will be 84 conducted by video conference must have a hyperlink and call-in 85 conference telephone number for unit owners to attend the 86 meeting and must have a physical location where unit owners can 87 also attend the meeting in person. All meetings conducted by 88 video conference which are open to the unit owners must be 89 recorded, and such recording must be maintained as an official 90 record of the association. 91 Section 2.âParagraph (c) of subsection (12) of section 92 718.111, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 93 718.111âThe association.â 94 (12)âOFFICIAL RECORDS.â 95 (c)1.a.âThe official records of the association are open to 96 inspection by any association member and any person authorized 97 by an association member as a representative of such member at 98 all reasonable times. The right to inspect the records includes 99 the right to make or obtain copies, at the reasonable expense, 100 if any, of the member and of the person authorized by the 101 association member as a representative of such member. A renter 102 of a unit has a right to inspect and copy only the declaration 103 of condominium, the associationâs bylaws and rules, and the 104 inspection reports described in ss. 553.899 and 718.301(4)(p). 105 The association may adopt reasonable rules regarding the 106 frequency, time, location, notice, and manner of record 107 inspections and copying but may not require a member to 108 demonstrate any purpose or state any reason for the inspection. 109 The failure of an association to provide the records within 10 110 working days after receipt of a written request creates a 111 rebuttable presumption that the association willfully failed to 112 comply with this paragraph. A unit owner who is denied access to 113 official records is entitled to the actual damages or minimum 114 damages for the associationâs willful failure to comply. Minimum 115 damages are $50 per calendar day for up to 10 days, beginning on 116 the 11th working day after receipt of the written request. The 117 failure to permit inspection entitles any person prevailing in 118 an enforcement action to recover reasonable attorney fees from 119 the person in control of the records who, directly or 120 indirectly, knowingly denied access to the records. If the 121 requested records are posted on an associationâs website, or are 122 available for download through an application on a mobile 123 device, the association may fulfill its obligations under this 124 paragraph by directing to the website or the application all 125 persons authorized to request access. 126 b.âIn response to a written request to inspect records, the 127 association must simultaneously provide to the requestor a 128 checklist of all records made available for inspection and 129 copying. The checklist must also identify any of the 130 associationâs official records that were not made available to 131 the requestor. An association must maintain a checklist provided 132 under this sub-subparagraph for 7 years. An association 133 delivering a checklist pursuant to this sub-subparagraph creates 134 a rebuttable presumption that the association has complied with 135 this paragraph. 136 2.âA director or member of the board or association or a 137 community association manager who willfully and knowingly or 138 intentionally violates subparagraph 1. commits a misdemeanor of 139 the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 140 775.083, and must be removed from office and a vacancy declared. 141 3.âA person who willfully and knowingly or intentionally 142 defaces or destroys accounting records that are required by this 143 chapter to be maintained during the period for which such 144 records are required to be maintained, or who willfully and 145 knowingly or intentionally fails to create or maintain 146 accounting records that are required to be created or 147 maintained, with the intent of causing harm to the association 148 or one or more of its members, commits a misdemeanor of the 149 first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 150 775.083; is personally subject to a civil penalty pursuant to s. 151 718.501(1)(e); and must be removed from office and a vacancy 152 declared. 153 4.âA person who willfully and knowingly or intentionally 154 refuses to release or otherwise produce association records with 155 the intent to avoid or escape detection, arrest, trial, or 156 punishment for the commission of a crime, or to assist another 157 person with such avoidance or escape, commits a felony of the 158 third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, 159 or s. 775.084, and must be removed from office and a vacancy 160 declared. 161 5.âThe association shall maintain an adequate number of 162 copies of the declaration, articles of incorporation, bylaws, 163 and rules, and all amendments to each of the foregoing, as well 164 as the question and answer sheet as described in s. 718.504 and 165 the most recent annual financial statement and annual budget 166 required under this section, on the condominium property to 167 ensure their availability to unit owners and prospective 168 purchasers, and may charge its actual costs for preparing and 169 furnishing these documents to those requesting the documents. An 170 association shall allow a member or his or her authorized 171 representative to use a portable device, including a smartphone, 172 tablet, portable scanner, or any other technology capable of 173 scanning or taking photographs, to make an electronic copy of 174 the official records in lieu of the associationâs providing the 175 member or his or her authorized representative with a copy of 176 such records. The association may not charge a member or his or 177 her authorized representative for the use of a portable device. 178 Notwithstanding this paragraph, the following records are not 179 accessible to unit owners: 180 a.âAny record protected by the lawyer-client privilege as 181 described in s. 90.502 and any record protected by the work 182 product privilege, including a record prepared by an association 183 attorney or prepared at the attorneyâs express direction, which 184 reflects a mental impression, conclusion, litigation strategy, 185 or legal theory of the attorney or the association, and which 186 was prepared exclusively for civil or criminal litigation or for 187 adversarial administrative proceedings, or which was prepared in 188 anticipation of such litigation or proceedings until the 189 conclusion of the litigation or proceedings. 190 b.âInformation obtained by an association in connection 191 with the approval of the lease, sale, or other transfer of a 192 unit. 193 c.âPersonnel records of association or management company 194 employees, including, but not limited to, disciplinary, payroll, 195 health, and insurance records. For purposes of this sub 196 subparagraph, the term âpersonnel recordsâ does not include 197 written employment agreements with an association employee or 198 management company, or budgetary or financial records that 199 indicate the compensation paid to an association employee. 200 d.âMedical records of unit owners. 201 e.âSocial security numbers, driver license numbers, credit 202 card numbers, e-mail addresses, telephone numbers, facsimile 203 numbers, emergency contact information, addresses of a unit 204 owner other than as provided to fulfill the associationâs notice 205 requirements, and other personal identifying information of any 206 person, excluding the personâs name, unit designation, mailing 207 address, property address, and any address, e-mail address, or 208 facsimile number provided to the association to fulfill the 209 associationâs notice requirements. Notwithstanding the 210 restrictions in this sub-subparagraph, an association may print 211 and distribute to unit owners a directory containing the name, 212 unit address, and all telephone numbers of each unit owner. 213 However, an owner may exclude his or her telephone numbers from 214 the directory by so requesting in writing to the association. An 215 owner may consent in writing to the disclosure of other contact 216 information described in this sub-subparagraph. The association 217 is not liable for the inadvertent disclosure of information that 218 is protected under this sub-subparagraph if the information is 219 included in an official record of the association and is 220 voluntarily provided by an owner and not requested by the 221 association. 222 f.âElectronic security measures that are used by the 223 association to safeguard data, including passwords. 224 g.âThe software and operating system used by the 225 association which allow the manipulation of data, even if the 226 owner owns a copy of the same software used by the association. 227 The data is part of the official records of the association. 228 h.âAll affirmative acknowledgments made pursuant to s. 229 718.121(4)(c). 230 6.a.âIf an association receives a subpoena or written 231 request for records from a law enforcement agency or prosecuting 232 agency as defined in 112.531, the association must provide a 233 copy of such records or otherwise make the records available for 234 inspection and copying to the law enforcement agency or 235 prosecuting agency within 5 business days after receipt of the 236 subpoena or written request, unless otherwise specified by the 237 law enforcement agency, prosecuting agency, or subpoena or 238 written request. An association must assist a law enforcement 239 agency and a prosecting agency in an investigation to the extent 240 permissible by law. 241 b.Â A director or member of the board or association or a 242 community association manager who willfully and knowingly fails 243 to provide a copy of records, or otherwise fails to make the 244 records available for inspection and copying, to a law 245 enforcement agency or prosecuting agency as required by sub 246 subparagraph a. commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, 247 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 248 Section 3.âParagraph (g) of subsection (2) of section 249 718.112, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 250 718.112âBylaws.â 251 (2)âREQUIRED PROVISIONS.âThe bylaws shall provide for the 252 following and, if they do not do so, shall be deemed to include 253 the following: 254 (g)âStructural integrity reserve study.â 255 1.âA residential condominium association must have a 256 structural integrity reserve study completed at least every 10 257 years after the condominiumâs creation for each building on the 258 condominium property that is three habitable stories or higher 259 in height, as determined by the Florida Building Code, which 260 includes, at a minimum, a study of the following items as 261 related to the structural integrity and safety of the building: 262 a.âRoof. 263 b.âStructure, including load-bearing walls and other 264 primary structural members and primary structural systems as 265 those terms are defined in s. 627.706. 266 c.âFireproofing and fire protection systems. 267 d.âPlumbing. 268 e.âElectrical systems. 269 f.âWaterproofing and exterior painting. 270 g.âWindows and exterior doors. 271 h.âAny other item that has a deferred maintenance expense 272 or replacement cost that exceeds $25,000 or the inflation 273 adjusted amount determined by the division under subparagraph 274 (f)6., whichever is greater, and the failure to replace or 275 maintain such item negatively affects the items listed in sub 276 subparagraphs a.-g., as determined by the visual inspection 277 portion of the structural integrity reserve study. 278 2.âA structural integrity reserve study is based on a 279 visual inspection of the condominium property. 280 3.a.âA structural integrity reserve study, including the 281 visual inspection portion of the structural integrity reserve 282 study, must be performed or verified by an engineer licensed 283 under chapter 471, an architect licensed under chapter 481, or a 284 person certified as a reserve specialist or professional reserve 285 analyst by the Community Associations Institute or the 286 Association of Professional Reserve Analysts. 287 b.âAny design professional as defined in s. 558.002 or any 288 contractor licensed under chapter 489 who bids to perform a 289 structural integrity reserve study must disclose in writing to 290 the association his or her intent to bid on any services related 291 to any maintenance, repair, or replacement that may be 292 recommended by the structural integrity reserve study. Any 293 design professional as defined in s. 558.002 or contractor 294 licensed under chapter 489 who submits a bid to the association 295 for performing any services recommended by the structural 296 integrity reserve study may not have an interest, directly or 297 indirectly, in the firm or entity providing the associationâs 298 structural integrity reserve study or be a relative of any 299 person having a direct or indirect interest in such firm, unless 300 such relationship is disclosed to the association in writing. As 301 used in this section, the term ârelativeâ means a relative 302 within the third degree of consanguinity by blood or marriage. A 303 contract for services is voidable and terminates upon the 304 association filing a written notice terminating the contract if 305 the design professional or licensed contractor failed to provide 306 the written disclosure of the interests or relationships 307 required under this paragraph. A design professional or licensed 308 contractor may be subject to discipline under the applicable 309 practice act for his or her profession for failure to provide 310 the written disclosure of the interests or relationships 311 required under this paragraph. 312 4.a.âAt a minimum, a structural integrity reserve study 313 must identify each item of the condominium property being 314 visually inspected, state the estimated remaining useful life 315 and the estimated replacement cost or deferred maintenance 316 expense of each item of the condominium property being visually 317 inspected, and provide a reserve funding plan or schedule with a 318 recommended annual reserve amount that achieves the estimated 319 replacement cost or deferred maintenance expense of each item of 320 condominium property being visually inspected by the end of the 321 estimated remaining useful life of the item. At a minimum, the 322 structural integrity reserve study must include a recommendation 323 for a reserve funding schedule based on a baseline funding plan 324 that provides a reserve funding goal in which the reserve 325 funding for each budget year is sufficient to maintain the 326 reserve cash balance above zero. The study may recommend other 327 types of reserve funding schedules, provided that each 328 recommended schedule is sufficient to meet the associationâs 329 maintenance obligation. 330 b.âThe structural integrity reserve study may recommend 331 that reserves do not need to be maintained for any item for 332 which an estimate of useful life and an estimate of replacement 333 cost cannot be determined, or the study may recommend a deferred 334 maintenance expense amount for such item. The structural 335 integrity reserve study may recommend that reserves for 336 replacement costs do not need to be maintained for any item with 337 an estimated remaining useful life of greater than 25 years, but 338 the study may recommend a deferred maintenance expense amount 339 for such item. If the structural integrity reserve study 340 recommends reserves for any item for which reserves are not 341 required under this paragraph, the amount of the recommended 342 reserves for such item must be separately identified in the 343 structural integrity reserve study as an item for which reserves 344 are not required under this paragraph. 345 c.âThe structural integrity reserve study must take into 346 consideration the funding method or methods used by the 347 association to fund its maintenance and reserve funding 348 obligations through regular assessments, special assessments, 349 lines of credit, or loans. If the structural integrity reserve 350 study is performed before the association has approved a special 351 assessment or secured a line of credit or a loan, the structural 352 integrity reserve study must be updated to reflect the funding 353 method selected by the association and its effect on the reserve 354 funding schedule, including any anticipated change in the amount 355 of regular assessments. The structural integrity reserve study 356 may be updated to reflect any changes to the useful life of the 357 reserve items after such items are repaired or replaced and the 358 effect such repair or replacement will have on the reserve 359 funding schedule. The association must obtain an updated 360 structural integrity reserve study before adopting any budget in 361 which the reserve funding from regular assessments, special 362 assessments, lines of credit, or loans does not align with the 363 funding plan from the most recent version of the structural 364 integrity reserve study. 365 5.âThis paragraph does not apply to buildings less than 366 three stories in height; single-family, two-family, three 367 family, or four-family dwellings with three or fewer habitable 368 stories above ground; any portion or component of a building 369 that has not been submitted to the condominium form of 370 ownership; or any portion or component of a building that is 371 maintained by a party other than the association. 372 6.âBefore a developer turns over control of an association 373 to unit owners other than the developer, the developer must have 374 a turnover inspection report in compliance with s. 718.301(4)(p) 375 and (q) for each building on the condominium property that is 376 three stories or higher in height. 377 7.âAssociations existing on or before July 1, 2022, which 378 are controlled by unit owners other than the developer, must 379 have a structural integrity reserve study completed by December 380 31, 2025, for each building on the condominium property that is 381 three habitable stories or higher in height. An association that 382 is required to complete a milestone inspection in accordance 383 with s. 553.899 on or before December 31, 2026, may complete the 384 structural integrity reserve study simultaneously with the 385 milestone inspection. In no event may the structural integrity 386 reserve study be completed after December 31, 2026. 387 8.âIf the milestone inspection required by s. 553.899, or 388 an inspection completed for a similar local requirement, was 389 performed within the past 5 years and meets the requirements of 390 this paragraph, such inspection may be used in place of the 391 visual inspection portion of the structural integrity reserve 392 study. 393 9.âIf the association completes a milestone inspection 394 required by s. 553.899, or an inspection completed for a similar 395 local requirement, the association may delay performance of a 396 required structural integrity reserve study for no more than the 397 2 consecutive budget years immediately following the milestone 398 inspection in order to allow the association to focus its 399 financial resources on completing the repair and maintenance 400 recommendations of the milestone inspection. 401 10.âIf the officers or directors of an association 402 willfully and knowingly fail to complete a structural integrity 403 reserve study pursuant to this paragraph, such failure is a 404 breach of an officerâs or a directorâs fiduciary relationship to 405 the unit owners under s. 718.111(1). An officer or a director of 406 an association must sign an affidavit acknowledging receipt of 407 the completed structural integrity reserve study. 408 11.âWithin 45 days after receiving the structural integrity 409 reserve study, the association must distribute a copy of the 410 study to each unit owner or deliver to each unit owner a notice 411 that the completed study is available for inspection and copying 412 upon a written request. Distribution of a copy of the study or 413 notice must be made by United States mail or personal delivery 414 to the mailing address, property address, or any other address 415 of the owner provided to fulfill the associationâs notice 416 requirements under this chapter, or by electronic transmission 417 to the e-mail address or facsimile number provided to fulfill 418 the associationâs notice requirements to unit owners who 419 previously consented to receive notice by electronic 420 transmission. 421 12.âWithin 45 days after receiving the structural integrity 422 reserve study, the association must provide the division with a 423 statement indicating that the study was completed and that the 424 association provided or made available such study to each unit 425 owner in accordance with this section. The statement must be 426 provided to the division in the manner established by the 427 division using a form posted on the divisionâs website. 428 13.âThe division shall adopt by rule the form for the 429 structural integrity reserve study in coordination with the 430 Florida Building Commission. 431 Section 4.âSubsection (7) of section 718.128, Florida 432 Statutes, is amended to read: 433 718.128âElectronic voting.âThe association may conduct 434 elections and other unit owner votes through an Internet-based 435 online voting system if a unit owner consents, electronically or 436 in writing, to online voting and if the following requirements 437 are met: 438 (7)(a)âUnless the association has adopted electronic voting 439 in accordance with subsections (1)-(6), the association must 440 designate an e-mail address, independent website, application, 441 or Internet web portal for receipt of electronically transmitted 442 ballots. Electronically transmitted ballots must meet all the 443 requirements of this subsection. 444 (b)âA unit owner may electronically transmit a ballot to 445 the e-mail address, independent website, application, or 446 Internet web portal designated by the association without 447 complying with s. 718.112(2)(d)3. s. 718.112(2)(d)4. or the 448 rules providing for the secrecy of ballots adopted by the 449 division. The association must count completed ballots that are 450 electronically transmitted to the designated e-mail address, 451 independent website, application, or Internet web portal 452 provided the completed ballots comply with the requirements of 453 this subsection. 454 (c)âA ballot that is electronically transmitted to the 455 association must include all of the following: 456 1.âA space for the unit owner to type in his or her unit 457 number. 458 2.âA space for the unit owner to type in his or her first 459 and last name, which also functions as the signature of the unit 460 owner for purposes of signing the ballot. 461 3.âThe following statement in capitalized letters and in a 462 font size larger than any other font size used in the electronic 463 transmission e-mail from the association to the unit owner: 464 465 WAIVING THE SECRECY OF YOUR BALLOT IS YOUR CHOICE. YOU 466 DO NOT HAVE TO WAIVE THE SECRECY OF YOUR BALLOT IN 467 ORDER TO VOTE. BY TRANSMITTING YOUR COMPLETED BALLOT 468 THROUGH ELECTRONIC MEANS E-MAIL TO THE ASSOCIATION, 469 YOU WAIVE THE SECRECY OF YOUR COMPLETED BALLOT. IF YOU 470 DO NOT WISH TO WAIVE YOUR SECRECY BUT WISH TO 471 PARTICIPATE IN THE VOTE THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THIS 472 BALLOT, PLEASE ATTEND THE IN-PERSON MEETING DURING 473 WHICH THE MATTER WILL BE VOTED ON. 474 475 (d)âA unit owner must transmit his or her completed ballot 476 to the e-mail address, independent website, application, or 477 Internet web portal designated by the association no later than 478 the scheduled date and time of the meeting during which the 479 matter is being voted on. 480 (e)âThere is a rebuttable presumption that an association 481 has reviewed all folders associated with the e-mail address, 482 independent website, application, or Internet web portal 483 designated by the association to receive ballots if a board 484 member, an officer, or an agent of the association, or a manager 485 licensed under part VIII of chapter 468, provides a sworn 486 affidavit attesting to such review. 487 Section 5.âParagraph (k) of subsection (1) of section 488 719.106, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 489 719.106âBylaws; cooperative ownership.â 490 (1)âMANDATORY PROVISIONS.âThe bylaws or other cooperative 491 documents shall provide for the following, and if they do not, 492 they shall be deemed to include the following: 493 (k)âStructural integrity reserve study.â 494 1.âA residential cooperative association must have a 495 structural integrity reserve study completed at least every 10 496 years for each building on the cooperative property that is 497 three habitable stories or higher in height, as determined by 498 the Florida Building Code, that includes, at a minimum, a study 499 of the following items as related to the structural integrity 500 and safety of the building: 501 a.âRoof. 502 b.âStructure, including load-bearing walls and other 503 primary structural members and primary structural systems as 504 those terms are defined in s. 627.706. 505 c.âFireproofing and fire protection systems. 506 d.âPlumbing. 507 e.âElectrical systems. 508 f.âWaterproofing and exterior painting. 509 g.âWindows and exterior doors. 510 h.âAny other item that has a deferred maintenance expense 511 or replacement cost that exceeds $25,000 or the inflation 512 adjusted amount determined by the division under subparagraph 513 (j)6., whichever is greater, and the failure to replace or 514 maintain such item negatively affects the items listed in sub 515 subparagraphs a.-g., as determined by the visual inspection 516 portion of the structural integrity reserve study. 517 2.âA structural integrity reserve study is based on a 518 visual inspection of the cooperative property. 519 3.a.âA structural integrity reserve study, including the 520 visual inspection portion of the structural integrity reserve 521 study, must be performed or verified by an engineer licensed 522 under chapter 471, an architect licensed under chapter 481, or a 523 person certified as a reserve specialist or professional reserve 524 analyst by the Community Associations Institute or the 525 Association of Professional Reserve Analysts. 526 b.âAny design professional as defined in s. 558.002(7) or 527 contractor licensed under chapter 489 who bids to perform a 528 structural integrity reserve study must disclose in writing to 529 the association his or her intent to bid on any services related 530 to any maintenance, repair, or replacement that may be 531 recommended by the structural integrity reserve study. Any 532 design professional as defined in s. 558.002 or contractor 533 licensed under chapter 489 who submits a bid to the association 534 for performing any services recommended by the structural 535 integrity reserve study may not have an interest, directly or 536 indirectly, in the firm or entity providing the associationâs 537 structural integrity reserve study or be a relative of any 538 person having a direct or indirect interest in such firm, unless 539 such relationship is disclosed to the association in writing. As 540 used in this section, the term ârelativeâ means a relative 541 within the third degree of consanguinity by blood or marriage. A 542 contract for services is voidable and terminates upon the 543 association filing a written notice terminating the contract if 544 the design professional or licensed contractor failed to provide 545 the written disclosure of the relationship required under this 546 paragraph. A design professional or licensed contractor may be 547 subject to discipline under the applicable practice act for his 548 or her profession for failure to provide the written disclosure 549 of the relationship required under this subparagraph. 550 4.a.âAt a minimum, a structural integrity reserve study 551 must identify each item of the cooperative property being 552 visually inspected, state the estimated remaining useful life 553 and the estimated replacement cost or deferred maintenance 554 expense of each item of the cooperative property being visually 555 inspected, and provide a reserve funding schedule with a 556 recommended annual reserve amount that achieves the estimated 557 replacement cost or deferred maintenance expense of each item of 558 cooperative property being visually inspected by the end of the 559 estimated remaining useful life of the item. The structural 560 integrity reserve study may recommend that reserves do not need 561 to be maintained for any item for which an estimate of useful 562 life and an estimate of replacement cost cannot be determined, 563 or the study may recommend a deferred maintenance expense amount 564 for such item. At a minimum, the structural integrity reserve 565 study must include a recommendation for a reserve funding 566 schedule based on a baseline funding plan that provides a 567 reserve funding goal in which the reserve funding for each 568 budget year is sufficient to maintain the reserve cash balance 569 above zero. The study may recommend other types of reserve 570 funding schedules, provided that each recommended schedule is 571 sufficient to meet the associationâs maintenance obligation. 572 b.âThe structural integrity reserve study may recommend 573 that reserves for replacement costs do not need to be maintained 574 for any item with an estimated remaining useful life of greater 575 than 25 years, but the study may recommend a deferred 576 maintenance expense amount for such item. If the structural 577 integrity reserve study recommends reserves for any item for 578 which reserves are not required under this paragraph, the amount 579 of the recommended reserves for such item must be separately 580 identified in the structural integrity reserve study as an item 581 for which reserves are not required under this paragraph. 582 c.âThe structural integrity reserve study must take into 583 consideration the funding method or methods used by the 584 association to fund its maintenance and reserve funding 585 obligations through regular assessments, special assessments, 586 lines of credit, or loans. If the structural integrity reserve 587 study is performed before the association has approved a special 588 assessment or secured a line of credit or a loan, the structural 589 integrity reserve study must be updated to reflect the funding 590 method selected by the association and its effect on the reserve 591 funding schedule, including any anticipated change in the amount 592 of regular assessments. The structural integrity reserve study 593 may be updated to reflect any changes to the useful life of the 594 reserve items after such items are repaired or replaced, and the 595 effect such repair or replacement will have on the reserve 596 funding schedule. The association must obtain an updated 597 structural integrity reserve study before adopting any budget in 598 which the reserve funding from regular assessments, special 599 assessments, lines of credit, or loans does not align with the 600 funding plan from the most recent version of the structural 601 integrity reserve study. 602 5.âThis paragraph does not apply to buildings less than 603 three stories in height; single-family, two-family, three 604 family, or four-family dwellings with three or fewer habitable 605 stories above ground; any portion or component of a building 606 that has not been submitted to the cooperative form of 607 ownership; or any portion or component of a building that is 608 maintained by a party other than the association. 609 6.âBefore a developer turns over control of an association 610 to unit owners other than the developer, the developer must have 611 a turnover inspection report in compliance with s. 719.301(4)(p) 612 and (q) for each building on the cooperative property that is 613 three stories or higher in height. 614 7.âAssociations existing on or before July 1, 2022, which 615 are controlled by unit owners other than the developer, must 616 have a structural integrity reserve study completed by December 617 31, 2024, for each building on the cooperative property that is 618 three habitable stories or higher in height. An association that 619 is required to complete a milestone inspection on or before 620 December 31, 2026, in accordance with s. 553.899 may complete 621 the structural integrity reserve study simultaneously with the 622 milestone inspection. In no event may the structural integrity 623 reserve study be completed after December 31, 2026. 624 8.âIf the milestone inspection required by s. 553.899, or 625 an inspection completed for a similar local requirement, was 626 performed within the past 5 years and meets the requirements of 627 this paragraph, such inspection may be used in place of the 628 visual inspection portion of the structural integrity reserve 629 study. 630 9.âIf the association completes a milestone inspection 631 required by s. 553.899, or an inspection completed for a similar 632 local requirement, the association may delay performance of a 633 required structural integrity reserve study for no more than the 634 2 consecutive budget years immediately following the milestone 635 inspection in order to allow the association to focus its 636 financial resources on completing the repair and maintenance 637 recommendations of the milestone inspection. 638 10.âIf the officers or directors of an association 639 willfully and knowingly fail to complete a structural integrity 640 reserve study pursuant to this paragraph, such failure is a 641 breach of an officerâs and directorâs fiduciary relationship to 642 the unit owners under s. 719.104(9). An officer or a director of 643 the association must sign an affidavit acknowledging receipt of 644 the completed structural integrity reserve study. 645 11.âWithin 45 days after receiving the structural integrity 646 reserve study, the association must distribute a copy of the 647 study to each unit owner or deliver to each unit owner a notice 648 that the completed study is available for inspection and copying 649 upon a written request. Distribution of a copy of the study or 650 notice must be made by United States mail or personal delivery 651 at the mailing address, property address, or any other address 652 of the owner provided to fulfill the associationâs notice 653 requirements under this chapter, or by electronic transmission 654 to the e-mail address or facsimile number provided to fulfill 655 the associationâs notice requirements to unit owners who 656 previously consented to receive notice by electronic 657 transmission. 658 12.âWithin 45 days after receiving the structural integrity 659 reserve study, the association must provide the division with a 660 statement indicating that the study was completed and that the 661 association provided or made available such study to each unit 662 owner in accordance with this section. Such statement must be 663 provided to the division in the manner established by the 664 division using a form posted on the divisionâs website. 665 13.âThe division shall adopt by rule the form for the 666 structural integrity reserve study in coordination with the 667 Florida Building Commission. 668 Section 6.âSubsections (2) and (8) of section 720.301, 669 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 670 720.301âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 671 (2)ââCommon areaâ means all real property within a 672 community which is owned or leased by an association or 673 dedicated for use or maintenance by the association or its 674 members, including, regardless of whether title has been 675 conveyed to the association: 676 (a)âReal property the use of which is dedicated to the 677 association or its members by a recorded plat; or 678 (b)âReal property committed by a declaration of covenants 679 to be leased or conveyed to the association; 680 (c)âReal property for which the developer or other owner of 681 common areas has required, in the governing documents or 682 otherwise, the association or its members to pay assessments or 683 amenity fees for use or maintenance; or 684 (d)âRecreational facilities and other properties serving 685 the parcels which the governing documents allow the owner of a 686 parcel to access, use, or enjoy as a benefit of parcel 687 ownership. 688 (8)ââGoverning documentsâ means: 689 (a)âThe recorded declaration of covenants for a community 690 and all duly adopted and recorded amendments, supplements, and 691 recorded exhibits thereto; and 692 (b)âThe articles of incorporation and bylaws of the 693 homeownersâ association and any duly adopted amendments thereto; 694 and 695 (c)Â All covenants running with the land which are binding 696 on the association or its members. 697 Section 7.âSubsection (3) of section 720.302, Florida 698 Statutes, is amended to read: 699 720.302âPurposes, scope, and application.â 700 (3)âThis chapter does not apply to: 701 (a)âA community that is composed of property primarily 702 intended for commercial, industrial, or other nonresidential 703 use; or 704 (b)âThe commercial or industrial parcels in a community 705 that contains both residential parcels and parcels intended for 706 commercial or industrial use, provided that this paragraph does 707 not affect the applicability of this chapter to any residential 708 parcel, common area, or the developer or other owner of a common 709 area. 710 Section 8.âParagraphs (a), (d), and (i) of subsection (5) 711 of section 720.303, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 712 720.303âAssociation powers and duties; meetings of board; 713 official records; budgets; financial reporting; association 714 funds; recalls.â 715 (5)âINSPECTION AND COPYING OF RECORDS.â 716 (a)âThe official records of the association are open to 717 inspection by any association member and any person authorized 718 by an association member as a representative of such member at 719 all reasonable times. Unless otherwise provided by law or the 720 governing documents of the association, the official records 721 must be maintained within this state for at least 7 years and be 722 made available to a parcel owner for inspection or photocopying 723 within 45 miles of the community or within the county in which 724 the association is located within 10 business days after receipt 725 by the board or its designee of a written request from the 726 parcel owner. This subsection may be complied with by having a 727 copy of the official records available for inspection or copying 728 in the community or by making the records available to a parcel 729 owner electronically via the Internet or by allowing the records 730 to be viewed in electronic format on a computer screen and 731 printed upon request. If the association has a photocopy machine 732 available where the records are maintained, it must provide 733 parcel owners with copies on request during the inspection if 734 the entire request is limited to no more than 25 pages. An 735 association shall allow a member or his or her authorized 736 representative to use a portable device, including a smartphone, 737 tablet, portable scanner, or any other technology capable of 738 scanning or taking photographs, to make an electronic copy of 739 the official records in lieu of the associationâs providing the 740 member or his or her authorized representative with a copy of 741 such records. The association may not charge a fee to a member 742 or his or her authorized representative for the use of a 743 portable device. 744 (d)âAny director or member of the board or association or a 745 community association manager who knowingly and, willfully, and 746 repeatedly violates paragraph (a), with the intent of causing 747 harm to the association or one or more of its members, commits a 748 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s. 749 775.082 or s. 775.083. For purposes of this paragraph, the term 750 ârepeatedlyâ means two or more violations within a 12-month 751 period. 752 (i)1.âIf an association receives a subpoena or written 753 request for records from a law enforcement agency or prosecuting 754 agency as defined in 112.531, the association must provide a 755 copy of such records or otherwise make the records available for 756 inspection and copying to a law enforcement agency or 757 prosecuting agency within 5 business days after receipt of the 758 subpoena or written request, unless otherwise specified by the 759 law enforcement agency, prosecuting agency, or subpoena or 760 written request. An association must assist a law enforcement 761 agency in its investigation to the extent permissible by law. 762 2.âA director or member of the board or association or a 763 community association manager who willfully and knowingly fails 764 to provide a copy of records to a law enforcement agency or 765 prosecuting agency, or otherwise fails to make the records 766 available for inspection and copying, as required by 767 subparagraph 1. commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, 768 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 769 Section 9.âSubsection (1) of section 720.305, Florida 770 Statutes, is amended to read: 771 720.305âObligations of members; remedies at law or in 772 equity; levy of fines and suspension of use rights.â 773 (1)âEach member and the memberâs tenants, guests, and 774 invitees, and each association, are governed by, and must comply 775 with, this chapter, the governing documents of the community, 776 and the rules of the association. Actions at law or in equity, 777 or both, to redress alleged failure or refusal to comply with 778 these provisions may be brought by the association or by any 779 member against: 780 (a)âThe association; 781 (b)âA member; 782 (c)âAny director or officer of an association who willfully 783 and knowingly fails to comply with these provisions; and 784 (d)âAny tenants, guests, or invitees occupying a parcel or 785 using the common areas; and 786 (e)âThe developer or other owner of a common area, 787 regardless of whether the developer or other owner of common 788 areas is a member of the association. 789 790 The prevailing party in any such litigation is entitled to 791 recover reasonable attorney fees and costs. A member prevailing 792 in an action between the association and the member under this 793 section, in addition to recovering his or her reasonable 794 attorney fees, may recover additional amounts as determined by 795 the court to be necessary to reimburse the member for his or her 796 share of assessments levied by the association to fund its 797 expenses of the litigation. This relief does not exclude other 798 remedies provided by law. This section does not deprive any 799 person of any other available right or remedy. 800 Section 10.âParagraphs (a), (k), and (t) of subsection (4) 801 of section 720.307, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 802 720.307âTransition of association control in a community. 803 With respect to homeownersâ associations: 804 (4)âAt the time the members are entitled to elect at least 805 a majority of the board of directors of the homeownersâ 806 association, the developer shall, at the developerâs expense, 807 within no more than 90 days deliver the following documents to 808 the board: 809 (a)âAll deeds to common areas property owned by the 810 association, and for any common area not already titled in the 811 associationâs name, the developer or other owner of common areas 812 shall convey title to the association. 813 (k)âAll tangible property for which of the association or 814 its members, through assessments or other mandatory payments 815 under the governing documents, are responsible for the cost of 816 operation and maintenance. 817 (t)âThe financial records, including financial statements 818 of the association and common areas, and source documents from 819 the incorporation of the association through the date of 820 turnover. The records shall be audited by an independent 821 certified public accountant for the period from the 822 incorporation of the association or from the period covered by 823 the last audit, if an audit has been performed for each fiscal 824 year since incorporation. All financial statements shall be 825 prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting 826 principles and shall be audited in accordance with generally 827 accepted auditing standards, as prescribed by the Board of 828 Accountancy, pursuant to chapter 473. The certified public 829 accountant performing the audit shall examine to the extent 830 necessary supporting documents and records, including the cash 831 disbursements and related paid invoices to determine if 832 expenditures were for association purposes and the billings, 833 cash receipts, and related records of the association to 834 determine that the developer was charged and paid the proper 835 amounts of assessments. This paragraph applies to associations 836 with a date of incorporation after December 31, 2007. 837 Section 11.âParagraphs (d) and (e) are added to subsection 838 (1) of section 720.3075, Florida Statutes, to read: 839 720.3075âProhibited clauses in association documents.â 840 (1)âIt is declared that the public policy of this state 841 prohibits the inclusion or enforcement of certain types of 842 clauses in homeownersâ association documents, including 843 declaration of covenants, articles of incorporation, bylaws, or 844 any other document of the association which binds members of the 845 association, which either have the effect of or provide that: 846 (d)âAn association or its members are required to pay an 847 assessment for mandatory membership in a club under the control 848 and ownership of the developer or any person other than the 849 association, and nonpayment of such mandatory fee is enforceable 850 by the developer, or any person other than the association, by a 851 lien on any individual parcel. 852 (e)âAn association or any of its members are prohibited or 853 restricted from filing or prospectively waiving the ability to 854 protest or seek any remedy for a violation of this chapter. 855 856 Such clauses are declared null and void as against the public 857 policy of this state. 858 Section 12.âParagraph (e) is added to subsection (1) of 859 section 720.308, Florida Statutes, to read: 860 720.308âAssessments and charges.â 861 (1)âASSESSMENTS.âFor any community created after October 1, 862 1995, the governing documents must describe the manner in which 863 expenses are shared and specify the memberâs proportional share 864 thereof. 865 (e)âAssessments payable to the developer or other owner of 866 a common area may not exceed the memberâs proportional share of 867 the expenses set forth in the annual budget approved by the 868 association. 869 Section 13.âSection 720.3086, Florida Statutes, is amended 870 to read: 871 720.3086âFinancial report.âIn a residential subdivision in 872 which the owners of lots or parcels must pay mandatory 873 maintenance or amenity fees to the subdivision developer or to 874 the owners of the common areas, recreational facilities, and 875 other properties serving the lots or parcels, the developer or 876 owner of such areas, facilities, or properties shall make 877 public, within 60 days following the end of each fiscal year, a 878 complete financial report of the actual, total receipts of 879 mandatory maintenance or amenity fees received by it, and an 880 itemized listing of the expenditures made by it from such fees, 881 for that year. A financial report required by this section must 882 conform to the same type of financial statement that the 883 association serving the residential subdivision is required to 884 prepare or cause to be prepared under s. 720.303(7)(a). Such 885 report and a written notice that a copy of the financial report 886 is available upon request at no charge to the parcel owner shall 887 be made public by mailing it to each lot or parcel owner in the 888 subdivision, by publishing it in a publication regularly 889 distributed within the subdivision, and or by posting it in 890 prominent locations in the subdivision. This section does not 891 apply to amounts paid to homeowner associations pursuant to 892 chapter 617, chapter 718, chapter 719, chapter 721, or chapter 893 723, or to amounts paid to local governmental entities, 894 including special districts. 895 Section 14.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.